Hawaii statutes.
§802-6 Subsequent ability to pay counsel.
If at any time after counsel is appointed, the court having jurisdiction in the
matter is satisfied that the defendant is financially able to obtain counsel or
to make partial payment for the representation, the court may terminate the
appointment of counsel, unless the person so represented is willing to pay
therefor. If appointed counsel continues the representation, the court shall
direct payment for such representation as the interests of justice may dictate.
Any payments directed by the court shall be general fund realizations.

If at any time after the counsel's appointment
counsel should have reason to believe that a defendant is financially able to
obtain counsel or to make partial payment for counsel, it shall be the
counsel's duty to so advise the court so that appropriate action may be taken.
[L 1971, c 185, pt of §1; HRS §705C-6; ren L 1972, c 9, §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next